Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5013.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 462g. (1) The testimony of a victim is not required in a prosecution under this chapter. However, if a victim testifies, that testimony need not be corroborated. (2) Expert testimony as to the behavioral patterns of human trafficking victims and the manner in which a human trafficking victim's behavior may deviate from societal expectations is admissible as evidence in court in a prosecution under this chapter if the expert testimony is otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence and laws of this state.In a prosecution under this chapter, a witness may be qualified by the court as an expert if the witness has specialized knowledge beyond that possessed by the average layperson based on the witness' experience with, or specialized training or education in, criminal justice, behavioral sciences, or victim services issues related to human trafficking that will assist the trier of fact in understanding the dynamics of human trafficking, victim response to human trafficking, and the impact of human trafficking on victims during and after victimization. (3) If qualified as an expert under subsection (2), a witness may testify and provide the witness's opinion regarding specific types of victim responses and victim behaviors. (4) The opinion of a witness who has been qualified under subsection (2) regarding the credibility of any other witness, including the victim, is not admissible. (5) A witness who has been qualified under subsection (2) may be called to testify as an expert as provided in this section by either the prosecution or the defense. (6) (3) A victim or complainant must not be excused from attending and testifying or producing any books, papers, or other documents before a court or magistrate on an investigation, proceeding, or trial for a violation of this chapter on the grounds that the testimony or evidence may tend to incriminate the victim or complainant. Truthful testimony, evidence, or other truthful information elicited under this section and any information derived directly or indirectly from that truthful testimony, evidence, or other truthful information must not be used against the victim or complainant in a criminal case, except for impeachment purposes or in a prosecution for perjury or otherwise failing to testify or produce evidence as required.